Utah statutes.
57-8a-304.   Provisions applicable to nonjudicial foreclosure.

(1)  An association's nonjudicial foreclosure of a lot is governed by:

(a)  Sections 57-1-19 through 57-1-34, to the same extent as though the association's lien were a trust deed; and

(b)  this part.

(2)  If there is a conflict between a provision of this part and a provision of Sections 57-1-19 through 57-1-34 with respect to an association's nonjudicial foreclosure of a lot, the provision of this part controls.

